apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="oř__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>me</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eme</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>emeť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>emť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eš</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ešť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ete</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eteť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ou</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouc</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouce</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pouč/it__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>iti</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>it</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>me</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eni</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enu</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eny</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ena</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eno</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enas</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enos</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>il</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ils</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilas</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ily</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilyť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ila</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilať</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilo</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ilos</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iloť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ili</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iliť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>im</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ím</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ímť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íme</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ímeť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íš</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íšť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íte</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íteť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>í</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ej</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>í</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íť</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iv</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íc</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ivši</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íce</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ivše</l><r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pr__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>eme</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>emeť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>emť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eš</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ešť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ete</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eteť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="odvozit"><i>odvoz</i><par n="pouč/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="označit"><i>označ</i><par n="pouč/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plyn"><i>plyn</i><par n="oř__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podařit"><i>podař</i><par n="pouč/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pokus"><i>pokus</i><par n="oř__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="postup"><i>postup</i><par n="oř__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="počt"><i>počt</i><par n="oř__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="př"><i>př</i><par n="pr__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="připojit"><i>připoj</i><par n="pouč/it__vblex"/></e>
